Alaska, session 34, HB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.42.020(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) The department shall 06 (1) plan, design, construct, and maintain all state modes of 07 transportation and transportation facilities and all docks, floats, breakwaters, buildings, 08 and similar facilities; 09 (2) study existing transportation modes and facilities in the state to 10 determine how they might be improved or whether they should continue to be 11 maintained; 12 (3) study alternative means of improving transportation in the state 13 with regard to the economic costs of each alternative and its environmental and social 14 effects, including public, tribal, and community transit programs; 01 (4) develop a comprehensive, long-range, intermodal transportation 02 plan for the state, including public, tribal, and community transit programs; 03 (5) study alternatives to existing modes of transportation in urban, 04 rural, and remote areas and develop plans to improve [URBAN] transportation 05 systems through coordination with metropolitan planning organizations, local 06 governments, communities, tribal entities, and public and community transit 07 operators, including ferry operators and the Alaska Railroad Corporation; 08 (6) cooperate and coordinate with and enter into agreements with 09 federal, state, and local government agencies and private organizations and persons in 10 exercising its powers and duties; 11 (7) manage, operate, and maintain state transportation facilities and all 12 docks, floats, breakwaters, and buildings, including all state highways, vessels, 13 railroads, pipelines, airports, and aviation facilities; 14 (8) study alternative means of transportation in the state, considering 15 the economic, social, and environmental effects of each alternative; 16 (9) coordinate and develop state and regional transportation systems, 17 considering deletions, additions, and the absence of alterations; 18 (10) develop facility program plans for transportation and state 19 buildings, docks, and breakwaters required to implement the duties set out in this 20 section, including but not limited to functional performance criteria and schedules for 21 completion; 22 (11) supervise and maintain all state automotive and mechanical 23 equipment, aircraft, and vessels, except vessels and aircraft used by the Department of 24 Fish and Game or the Department of Public Safety; for state vehicles maintained by 25 the department, the department shall, every five years, evaluate the cost, efficiency, 26 and commercial availability of alternative fuels for automotive purposes, and the 27 purpose for which the vehicles are intended to be used, and convert vehicles to use 28 alternative fuels or purchase energy efficient vehicles whenever practicable; the 29 department may participate in joint ventures with public or private partners that will 30 foster the availability of alternative fuels for all automotive fuel consumers; 31 (12) supervise aeronautics inside the state, under AS 02.10; 01 (13) implement the safety and financial responsibility requirements for 02 air carriers under AS 02.40; 03 (14) inspect weights and measures; 04 (15) at least every four years, study alternatives available to finance 05 transportation systems in order to provide an adequate level of funding to sustain and 06 improve the state's transportation system; 07 (16) allot space to and manage space in state buildings for the various 08 departments according to need and available space; 09 (17) develop a statewide public and community transit plan in 10 coordination with metropolitan planning organizations, local governments, 11 communities, tribal entities, and public and community transit operators, 12 including ferry operators and the Alaska Railroad Corporation. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 44.42.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 14 (c) In this section, "tribal entity" means a tribe that the United States Secretary 15 of the Interior recognizes as an Indian tribe under 25 U.S.C. 5130 and 5131 (Federally 16 Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994), and a subdivision, subsidiary, or business 17 enterprise wholly owned by one or more tribes. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.